Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1732.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 27-200 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Schools shall have the right to broadcast all high school
athletic activities in this state in which the school's athletic
team is participating.
B. If the Oklahoma Secondary School Activities Association
enters into an exclusive broadcast agreement for an athletic
activity, such agreement shall not prohibit a local broadcaster or
school from broadcasting a school's athletic activity in which the
school's athletic team is participating.

C. The provisions of this section shall apply to contracts
involving the right to broadcast that are entered into or renewed on
or after the effective date of this act.
D. For purposes of this section:
1. "Athletic activity" means any high school athletic pre-
season, regular season, or playoff game;
2. "Broadcast" means the live or recorded audio or video
transmission over airwaves, streaming, or other transmission of an
athletic activity, play-by-play, or other account of such activity
via radio, television, Internet, or other technologies;
3. "Exclusive broadcast agreement" means an agreement entered
into between the Oklahoma Secondary School Activities Association
and an organization to broadcast the Oklahoma Secondary School
Activities Association's athletic activities under which such
organization retains sole rights to broadcast such activities or
first right to broadcast such activities;
4. "Local broadcaster" means an organization, located in
Oklahoma, that provides local broadcast services for any activity of
a local school. Local broadcaster includes school-sponsored
organizations that produce student-organized broadcasts such as
educational courses or programs offered by the school; and
5. "Organization" means an individual, public or private
corporation, partnership, limited liability company, association,
joint venture, or any other legal or commercial entity.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1732 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 30th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1732 Page 3